Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2850.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT SERVICES.new text end new text begin $450,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $450,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for grants to Ambassadors of Culture, Hooyo Hour, and United Way of Central Minnesota to work collaboratively in providing workforce development services for diverse communities, particularly young adults, mothers from immigrant backgrounds, and youth from East African communities. The services must focus on enhancing skills, education, and employment opportunities through job training, job coaching, employer engagement, and career coaching. This is a onetime appropriation. Of this amount: new text end new text begin (1) $150,000 each year is for a grant to Ambassadors of Culture; new text end new text begin (2) $150,000 each year is for a grant to Hooyo Hour; and new text end new text begin (3) $150,000 each year is for a grant to United Way of Central Minnesota. new text end